Minnesota, session 2025-2026, HF4165.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF MINNESOTA: Section 1. Minnesota Statutes 2024, section 161.14, is amended by adding a subdivision to read: new text begin Subd. 111. new text end new text begin Lieutenant General Edward J. Heinz Memorial Bridge. new text end new text begin The bridge on U.S. Highway 61 over the Mississippi River, commonly known as the Hastings Bridge, in the city of Hastings is designated the "Lieutenant General Edward J. Heinz Memorial Bridge." Subject to section 161.139, the commissioner must adopt a suitable design to mark this bridge and erect appropriate signs. new text end